test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-valama75_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - valama: # Verb (75) valama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     valama+V+Inf/mA: valama
     valama+V+Inf: vallaq
     valama+V+Act+PrtPrc: valanuq
     valama+V+Pss+PrtPrc: valõt
     valama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: vala
     valama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: vala
     valama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: vali
     valama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: vali
